lexc/noun/enhuyi.lexc
!!!enhu2.lexc!!!

Multichar_Symbols  +Noun[gcat]

+Dis +Ess +Soc +Tem 
+Posss1s +Posss2s +Posss3s +Possp1s +Possp2s +Possp3s 
+Posss1p +Posss2p +Posss3p +Possp1p +Possp2p +Possp3p

+Plur +Fam +Gens +Genpl
      
+Abl +Acc[lfea] +Ade +All +Cau +Dat +Del
+Ela +Fac +For +Forp +Forpen +Ill +Ine +Ins +Nom
+Sub +Sup +Ter
      
§uue§ §OEOE2§
§UUE1§ §oooe§ §AAA§ §AA§ §AE1§ §AEyi§ §k§
§ooez3y§ §EOAy§ §OEOE1y§ §Jy§ §oeoez2y§
§UUEy§ §JPy§ §oeoez1y§ §oeoezy§ §VVy§ §oeoey§ §OEOEy§

      
LEXICON Root
Noun ;

!define Cons [b | c | d | f | g | h | j | k | l | m | n | p | q | r | s | t | v | w | x | y | z];
!define Vowel [a | á | e | é | i | í | o | ó | u | ú | ü | ű | ö | ő];
!define Root [ [Cons^{0,4} Vowel^{1,3}] | [Cons^{0,4} Vowel^{1,3} Cons^{1,4} Vowel^{0,3} ]* ] ;

LEXICON AddNoun
[stem]+Noun[gcat]:0     Poss;
[stem]+Noun[gcat]:0     Plur;
[stem]+Noun[gcat]:0     Fam;

LEXICON Poss
+Dis:^+cDis^§ooez3y§nként    #;    ! anként, enként
+Soc:^+cSoc^§EOAy§st§uue§l   #;    ! astul, estül
+Tem:^+cTem^kor             #;    ! kor
+Posss1s:^+cPosss1s^§OEOE1y§m   Fam;   ! m
+Posss2s:^+cPosss2s^§OEOE1y§d   Fam;   ! d
+Posss3s:^+cPosss3s^§Jy§§AE1§   Fam;   ! ja, je, a,e
+Possp1s:^+cPossp1s^§UUEy§nk   Fam;   ! unk, ünk
+Possp2s:^+cPossp2s^§OEOE1y§t§OEOEy§k   Fam;   ! etek, atok
+Possp3s:^+cPossp3s^§Jy§§UUE1§k   Fam;   ! ük, uk
+Posss1p:^+cPosss1p^§JPy§§AEyi§im   Fam;   ! aim
+Posss2p:^+cPosss2p^§JPy§§AEyi§id   Fam;   ! aid
+Posss3p:^+cPosss3p^§JPy§§AEyi§i   Fam;   ! ai, jai, ei, jei
+Possp1p:^+cPossp1p^§JPy§§AEyi§ink   Fam;   ! aink, eink
+Possp2p:^+cPossp2p^§JPy§§AEyi§it§OEOE2§k   Fam;  ! aitok, eitek
+Possp3p:^+cPossp3p^§JPy§§AEyi§ik   Fam;   !aik, jaik, eik, jeik
                           Fam;


LEXICON Plur
+Plur:^+cPlur^§oeoez1y§k    Gen;
                            Gen;
        
LEXICON Fam
+Fam:^+cFam^ék         Gen;
                       Gen;

LEXICON Gen
+Gens:^+cGens^é          Case;
+Genpl:^+cGenpl^éi     Case;
                       Case;
 
LEXICON Case
+Abl:^+cAbl^t§oooe§l       #;  ! tól, től
+Acc[lfea]:^+cAcc^§oeoez2y§t     #;  ! ot, et, öt, t
+Ade:^+cAde^n§AAA§l        #;  ! nál, nél
+All:^+cAll^h§oeoey§z      #;  ! hoz, hez, höz
+Cau:^+cCau^ért            #;  ! ért
+Dat:^+cDat^n§AA§k         #;  ! nak, nek
+Del:^+cDel^r§oooe§l       #;  ! ról, ről
+Ess:^+cEss^§uue§l          #;    ! ul, ül
+Ela:^+cEla^b§oooe§l       #;  ! ból, ből
+Fac:^+cFac^§VVy§§AAA§     #;  ! vá, vé
+Forp:^+ccForp^§k§épp          #;  ! ként, képp, képpen
+Forpen:^+cxForpen^§k§éppen          #;  ! ként, képp, képpen
+For:^+cFor^ként           #;  ! ként, képp, képpen
+Ill:^+cIll^b§AA§          #;  ! ból, ből
+Ine:^+cIne^b§AA§n         #;  ! ban, ben
+Ins:^+cIns^§VVy§§AA§l     #;  ! val, vel
+Nom:^+cNom^0              #;  ! 
+Sub:^+cSub^r§AA§          #;  ! ra, re
+Sup:^+cSup^§oeoezy§n      #;  ! on, en, ön, n
+Ter:^+cTer^ig             #;  ! ig
+Tem:^+cTem^§k§or #; ! kor

LEXICON Noun
Aggteleky AddNoun;
Airy AddNoun;
Alexy AddNoun;
Alföldy AddNoun;
Alszeghy AddNoun;
Alvinczy AddNoun;
Aujerszky AddNoun;
Aujeszky AddNoun;
Bacsinszky AddNoun;
Badzey AddNoun;
Bajcsy-Zsilinszky AddNoun;
Becsky AddNoun;
Bedy AddNoun;
Belatiny AddNoun;
Beliczky AddNoun;
Belky AddNoun;
Bendefy AddNoun;
Berczy AddNoun;
Bereczky AddNoun;
Beregfy AddNoun;
Beretzky AddNoun;
Berey AddNoun;
Berinkey AddNoun;
Berkeley AddNoun;
Berkesy AddNoun;
Berky AddNoun;
Berzenczey AddNoun;
Berzeviczy AddNoun;
Beszterczey AddNoun;
Bezerédy AddNoun;
Beély AddNoun;
Birly AddNoun;
Bisztriczky AddNoun;
Bitskey AddNoun;
Blattny AddNoun;
Bodroghközy AddNoun;
Bohuniczky AddNoun;
Boroviczény AddNoun;
Borsiczky AddNoun;
Borszéky AddNoun;
Bredeczky AddNoun;
Bresztyenszky AddNoun;
Bánhidy AddNoun;
Bánrévy AddNoun;
Bédy AddNoun;
Békessy AddNoun;
Béky AddNoun;
Békésy AddNoun;
Béldy AddNoun;
Bélley AddNoun;
Bélteky AddNoun;
Bérczy AddNoun;
Béry AddNoun;
Bölöny AddNoun;
Chalupetzky AddNoun;
Csehély AddNoun;
Csekey AddNoun;
Csemiczky AddNoun;
Csengery AddNoun;
Csengey AddNoun;
Csepreghy AddNoun;
Cserey AddNoun;
Csernátony AddNoun;
Csery AddNoun;
Cserzy AddNoun;
Cserépy AddNoun;
Csiby AddNoun;
Csiky AddNoun;
Csopey AddNoun;
Cséby AddNoun;
Csécsy AddNoun;
Cséry AddNoun;
Csörgey AddNoun;
Csüry AddNoun;
Czeczey AddNoun;
Czeglédy AddNoun;
Cziffery AddNoun;
Czindery AddNoun;
Debreczy AddNoun;
Debussy AddNoun;
Decsy AddNoun;
Delly AddNoun;
Dembinszky AddNoun;
Demeczky AddNoun;
Demszky AddNoun;
Derzsy AddNoun;
Desericzky AddNoun;
Dessewffy AddNoun;
Detrekőy AddNoun;
Dezséry AddNoun;
Deésy AddNoun;
Dicenty AddNoun;
Disney AddNoun;
Divéky AddNoun;
Diószeghy AddNoun;
Dunaiszky AddNoun;
Duplinszky AddNoun;
Duronelly AddNoun;
Dybisewszky AddNoun;
Déchy AddNoun;
Déry AddNoun;
Désy AddNoun;
Ebeczky AddNoun;
Egressy AddNoun;
Egry AddNoun;
Egyesy AddNoun;
Elekfy AddNoun;
Emericzy AddNoun;
Emődy AddNoun;
Endrey AddNoun;
Endrédy AddNoun;
Endrődy AddNoun;
Enyedy AddNoun;
Eperjessy AddNoun;
Ercsey AddNoun;
Erdey AddNoun;
Erdy AddNoun;
Erdélyszky AddNoun;
Erdődy AddNoun;
Erdőssy AddNoun;
Ereky AddNoun;
Erney AddNoun;
Ernyey AddNoun;
Ertsey AddNoun;
Erőssy AddNoun;
Eszterházy AddNoun;
Esterházy AddNoun;
Fabiny AddNoun;
Fabriczy AddNoun;
Fahidy AddNoun;
Farkasinszky AddNoun;
Feleky AddNoun;
Fenyvessy AddNoun;
Ferenczy AddNoun;
Feszty AddNoun;
Figyelmessy AddNoun;
Finkey AddNoun;
Finály AddNoun;
Frey AddNoun;
Frideczky AddNoun;
Fáskerthy AddNoun;
Földessy AddNoun;
Földesy AddNoun;
Földy AddNoun;
Fövényessy AddNoun;
Füzessy AddNoun;
Füzesséry AddNoun;
Füzesy AddNoun;
Főkövy AddNoun;
Garamszeghy AddNoun;
Garanecsy AddNoun;
Gelley AddNoun;
Gerencséry AddNoun;
Gergelyffy AddNoun;
Gerőffy AddNoun;
Ghimessy AddNoun;
Giczy AddNoun;
Gonzeczky AddNoun;
Grétsy AddNoun;
Gyökössy AddNoun;
Gyöngyösy AddNoun;
Györffy AddNoun;
Györkösy AddNoun;
Gyürey AddNoun;
Győrffy AddNoun;
Győrgyfy AddNoun;
Győry AddNoun;
Gáliczky AddNoun;
Géczy AddNoun;
Gömöry AddNoun;
Gönczy AddNoun;
Görgey AddNoun;
Görömbey AddNoun;
Gözsy AddNoun;
Hazslinszky AddNoun;
Hefty AddNoun;
Helfy AddNoun;
Helmeczy AddNoun;
Helvey AddNoun;
Hertelendy AddNoun;
Hettyey AddNoun;
Hetyey AddNoun;
Hevesy AddNoun;
Hideghéthy AddNoun;
Hiry AddNoun;
Hoitsy AddNoun;
Horusitzky AddNoun;
Hrabéczy AddNoun;
Icsey AddNoun;
Illy AddNoun;
Illéssy AddNoun;
Illésy AddNoun;
Inczédy AddNoun;
Inkey AddNoun;
Irsy AddNoun;
Istvány AddNoun;
Izdenczy AddNoun;
Jakobey AddNoun;
Jalsoviczky AddNoun;
Jaszlinszky AddNoun;
Jelky AddNoun;
Jeney AddNoun;
Jerney AddNoun;
Jersey AddNoun;
Jeszenszky AddNoun;
Jékey AddNoun;
Kaczvinszky AddNoun;
Kalecsinszky AddNoun;
Kassitzky AddNoun;
Kazaliczky AddNoun;
Kecskeméthy AddNoun;
Kelety AddNoun;
Kemechey AddNoun;
Kemenesy AddNoun;
Keméndy AddNoun;
Keményffy AddNoun;
Keményfy AddNoun;
Kenessey AddNoun;
Kennedy AddNoun;
Kentucky AddNoun;
Kenézy AddNoun;
Keresztessy AddNoun;
Kereszty AddNoun;
Kerny AddNoun;
Kertbeny AddNoun;
Kettesy AddNoun;
Kismarty AddNoun;
Klestinszky AddNoun;
Klobusiczky AddNoun;
Kmetty AddNoun;
Kmety AddNoun;
Knézy AddNoun;
Kopeczky AddNoun;
Korabinszky AddNoun;
Korenchy AddNoun;
Kosinszky AddNoun;
Koszeghy AddNoun;
Kremeneczky AddNoun;
Krencsey AddNoun;
Krunity AddNoun;
Kukorelly AddNoun;
Kulitzy AddNoun;
Kunszery AddNoun;
Kuzsinszky AddNoun;
Kéky AddNoun;
Kéméndy AddNoun;
Képessy AddNoun;
Kéry AddNoun;
Kérészy AddNoun;
Kéthly AddNoun;
Kétly AddNoun;
Kézy AddNoun;
Kölcsey AddNoun;
Kölesy AddNoun;
Köpesdy AddNoun;
Körmendy AddNoun;
Környey AddNoun;
Körössy AddNoun;
Körösy AddNoun;
Kövesligethy AddNoun;
Kövessy AddNoun;
Kövy AddNoun;
Középessy AddNoun;
Kürthy AddNoun;
Küry AddNoun;
Kőrössy AddNoun;
Kőrösy AddNoun;
Ladomerszky AddNoun;
Lenkeffy AddNoun;
Lenkey AddNoun;
Levitzky AddNoun;
Leövey AddNoun;
Lipcsey AddNoun;
Lipovniczky AddNoun;
Lipszky AddNoun;
Litkey AddNoun;
Lomniczy AddNoun;
Lorenthey AddNoun;
Lubinszky AddNoun;
Lévy AddNoun;
Lővvy AddNoun;
Lőwy AddNoun;
Majerszky AddNoun;
Maleczky AddNoun;
Martinszky AddNoun;
Mayerffy AddNoun;
Mecséry AddNoun;
Medgyessy AddNoun;
Medveczky AddNoun;
Medvey AddNoun;
Megyercsy AddNoun;
Megyery AddNoun;
Mekcsey AddNoun;
Mercy AddNoun;
Mezey AddNoun;
Mezőssy AddNoun;
Micskey AddNoun;
Mikesy AddNoun;
Mikuleczky AddNoun;
Mindszenthy AddNoun;
Mindszenty AddNoun;
Miskey AddNoun;
Misley AddNoun;
Muraközy AddNoun;
Mátéffy AddNoun;
Mérey AddNoun;
Méry AddNoun;
Nedeczky AddNoun;
Nemesdy AddNoun;
Nemesszeghy AddNoun;
Nemky AddNoun;
Ney AddNoun;
Niczky AddNoun;
Nikelszky AddNoun;
Nirschy AddNoun;
Nyiredy AddNoun;
Nyiry AddNoun;
Nécsey AddNoun;
Négyesy AddNoun;
Némethy AddNoun;
Névy AddNoun;
Olty AddNoun;
Pacséry AddNoun;
Pastinszky AddNoun;
Pekry AddNoun;
Pellérdy AddNoun;
Penyigey AddNoun;
Peregriny AddNoun;
Perity AddNoun;
Perliczy AddNoun;
Perrey AddNoun;
Perémy AddNoun;
Pesthy AddNoun;
Pesty AddNoun;
Peterdy AddNoun;
Petrőczy AddNoun;
Pewny AddNoun;
Peéry AddNoun;
Peéty AddNoun;
Pikéthy AddNoun;
Pilinszky AddNoun;
Plesnivy AddNoun;
Podmaniczky AddNoun;
Pompéry AddNoun;
Potkonitzky AddNoun;
Prileszky AddNoun;
Pruzsinszky AddNoun;
Pákey AddNoun;
Pásztorniczky AddNoun;
Péchy AddNoun;
Péczely AddNoun;
Pédery AddNoun;
Péterffy AddNoun;
Quimby AddNoun;
Rabatinszky AddNoun;
Radbezy AddNoun;
Rajeczky AddNoun;
Regőczy AddNoun;
Remsey AddNoun;
Repeczky AddNoun;
Repiczky AddNoun;
Reviczky AddNoun;
Rezsny AddNoun;
Rhédey AddNoun;
Riheczky AddNoun;
Rimely AddNoun;
Ritly AddNoun;
Rodiczky AddNoun;
Rubletzky AddNoun;
Récsey AddNoun;
Réczey AddNoun;
Rédey AddNoun;
Réthey AddNoun;
Réthly AddNoun;
Réthy AddNoun;
Révy AddNoun;
Saint-Exupéry AddNoun;
Salusinszky AddNoun;
Schilberszky AddNoun;
Schrotty AddNoun;
Schwenszky AddNoun;
Schwotty AddNoun;
Sehy AddNoun;
Semsey AddNoun;
Sennyey AddNoun;
Sepsy AddNoun;
Sereghy AddNoun;
Serly AddNoun;
Sexty AddNoun;
Shelley AddNoun;
Sitkey AddNoun;
Skutetzky AddNoun;
Spergely AddNoun;
Stasney AddNoun;
Strelisky AddNoun;
Stáhly AddNoun;
Szamosközy AddNoun;
Szegedy AddNoun;
Szekrényessy AddNoun;
Szenczy AddNoun;
Szendrey AddNoun;
Szenessy AddNoun;
Szentessy AddNoun;
Szentmártony AddNoun;
Szenvey AddNoun;
Szepesy AddNoun;
Szerelmey AddNoun;
Szigethy AddNoun;
Szivessy AddNoun;
Szombaty AddNoun;
Széchy AddNoun;
Székelyhidy AddNoun;
Szénfy AddNoun;
Szüry AddNoun;
Szőllőssy AddNoun;
Szőreghy AddNoun;
Sármezey AddNoun;
Sümeghy AddNoun;
Telegdy AddNoun;
Telepy AddNoun;
Tellyesniczky AddNoun;
Termetzky AddNoun;
Thököly AddNoun;
Télfy AddNoun;
Téry AddNoun;
Töltéssy AddNoun;
Töttössy AddNoun;
Tüköry AddNoun;
Ubrizsy AddNoun;
Vary AddNoun;
Velinszky AddNoun;
Verbőczy AddNoun;
Veredy AddNoun;
Verseghy AddNoun;
Veszely AddNoun;
Vidéky AddNoun;
Vizkelety AddNoun;
Vámbéry AddNoun;
Vértesy AddNoun;
Völcsey AddNoun;
Welleczky AddNoun;
Wessely AddNoun;
Weszely AddNoun;
Wosinsky AddNoun;
Zathureczky AddNoun;
Zichy AddNoun;
Zrumetzky AddNoun;
Zsilinszky AddNoun;
Zászkaliczky AddNoun;
assembly AddNoun;
brandy AddNoun;
city AddNoun;
fantasy AddNoun;
grizzly AddNoun;
intercity AddNoun;
proxy AddNoun;
zloty AddNoun;
Árkövy AddNoun;
Édeskuty AddNoun;
Érkövy AddNoun;
Óhidy AddNoun;
Ürmössy AddNoun;
